Washington statutes.
RCW 39.34.220

Watershed management plans—Additional authority for implementation—Existing agreements not affected.

The amendments by chapter 327, Laws of 2003 to the interlocal cooperation act authorities are intended to provide additional authority to public agencies for the purposes of implementing watershed management plans, and do not affect any agreements among public agencies existing on July 27, 2003.

[ 2003 c 327 s 7.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2003 c 327: See note following RCW 39.34.190.